Wyoming, session 2025, HB0197.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 16-13-101 through 16-13-103 are
created to read:

HB0197

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0664
CHAPTER 13
LAND USE REGULATIONS

ARTICLE 1
LIMITS ON AFFORDABLE OR WORKFORCE HOUSING EXACTIONS OR
MITIGATION FEES

16-13-101. Definitions.

(a) As used in this section:

(i) "Affordable or workforce housing exaction or
mitigation fee" means any fee imposed by a land use
permitting authority to be used to provide or offset
affordable or workforce housing costs as a condition of
granting a land use permit;

(ii) "Commercial development" means
constructing, renovating or building an addition to any
structure intended primarily for commercial purposes;

(iii) "Exaction or mitigation nexus study" means
a study conducted by a land use permitting authority which
HB0197

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0664
establishes a rational connection between an activity
described in subparagraph (vi)(A) or (B) of this subsection
and the exaction or mitigation fee imposed to provide
affordable or workforce housing;

(iv) "Individualized determination" means an
analysis conducted by a land use permitting authority
specific to the proposed residential or commercial
development that establishes that an affordable or
workforce housing exaction or mitigation fee imposed is
reasonably proportional, both in nature and extent, to the
proposed residential or commercial development impact;

(v) "Land use permitting authority" means any
governing body of a city, town, county, special district or
other entity of state or local government that issues land
use permits;

(vi) "Land use permit" means any permit that is
required by state law, local ordinance or rule to be
obtained before:

(A) A structure can be built or renovated;
HB0197

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0664

(B) An addition can be built onto an
existing structure.

(vii) "Residential development" means
constructing, renovating or building an addition to any
structure intended for human habitation.

16-13-102. Limits on imposition of affordable or
workforce housing exaction or mitigation fees on specified
proposed property development.

(a) Subject to W.S. 15-1-103(a)(li) and
18-2-101(a)(ix), a land use permitting authority may
require as a condition for the issuance of a land use
permit for residential or commercial development the
imposition of an affordable or workforce housing exaction
or mitigation fee if the fee is reasonably proportional,
both in nature and extent, to the costs of mitigating the
identified impact from the proposed residential or
commercial development as determined by an exaction and
mitigation nexus study. An affordable or workforce housing
exaction or mitigation fee imposed pursuant to this
HB0197

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0664
paragraph shall be collected and accounted for in the same
manner as other public funds. The maximum fee charged
pursuant to this paragraph shall not include any costs
attributable to the first three thousand (3,000) square
feet of a single-family residential dwelling or the first
one thousand seven hundred fifty (1,750) square feet of a
multi-family residential dwelling.

(b) No affordable or workforce housing exaction or
mitigation fee allowed under subsection (a) of this section
shall be more than the percentage determined by an exaction
or mitigation nexus study or four percent (4%), whichever
is less, of the total construction, renovation or addition
cost for all structures identified to serve primarily as
single-family residential dwellings, multi-family
residential dwellings or a commercial development.

(c) A land use permitting authority shall not,
directly or indirectly, impose an affordable or workforce
housing exaction or mitigation fee on the subdivision of
land or on any structure built, renovated or on which an
addition is built to support agricultural activities.

HB0197

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0664
16-13-103. Process and appeal.

(a) Land use permitting authorities shall provide
written notice to the residential or commercial development
applicant of affordable or workforce housing exaction or
mitigation fees not later than thirty (30) days before
imposing the affordable or workforce housing exaction or
mitigation fees. Upon receipt of an affordable or workforce
housing exaction or mitigation fee notice, the applicant
may request the land use permitting authority prepare an
individualized determination, at the expense of the land
use permitting authority, providing an explanation of the
affordable or workforce housing exaction or mitigation fee
amount imposed, including the methodology, supporting data
and information used to determine the impact anticipated to
be caused by the proposed residential or commercial
development and the method of calculating the affordable or
workforce housing exaction or mitigation fee amount based
on that identified impact.

(b) The land use permitting authority shall provide
the completed individualized determination not later than
sixty (60) days after receipt of the request. Unless an
HB0197

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0664
administrative appeal is filed, this individualized
determination shall be the final decision of the land use
permitting authority. If the individualized determination
is not completed and delivered to the residential or
commercial development applicant within sixty (60) days
after receipt of the request, the affordable or workforce
exaction or mitigation fee shall be waived.

(c) If the residential or commercial development
applicant objects to the methodology, supporting
information or conclusions set forth in the individualized
determination, the applicant may request a hearing before
the land use permitting authority. The request may be filed
immediately or may be delayed and included with other
matters arising in the applicant's permit review process
related to the residential or commercial development
application. Upon receiving a request for a hearing, the
land use permitting authority shall hold a public hearing
to determine the facts relating to the dispute over the
affordable or workforce housing exaction or mitigation fee
and shall render a final decision on the affordable or
workforce housing exaction or mitigation fee not later than
sixty (60) days after receiving the request for a hearing.
HB0197

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0664
In any hearing, the burden of proof is on the land use
permitting authority to demonstrate that the affordable or
workforce housing exaction or mitigation fee is reasonably
proportional, both in nature and extent, to the cost of
mitigating an identified impact of the propose residential
or commercial development.

(d) A residential or commercial development applicant
may elect to proceed under protest and pay a required
affordable or workforce housing exaction or mitigation fee
while the exaction or mitigation fee is challenged or
appealed. Any payment under protest of an affordable or
workforce housing exaction or mitigation fee shall not be
construed as a waiver of any objections or appeals or
rights to judicial review of the exaction or mitigation
fee. The land use permitting authority shall not require
the residential or commercial development applicant to pay
the affordable or workforce housing exaction or mitigation
fee as a prerequisite to challenging or appealing the
validity of the exaction or mitigation fee.

(e) A residential or commercial development applicant
may bring an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to
HB0197

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0664
challenge the validity or constitutionality of an
affordable or workforce housing exaction or mitigation fee
following the public hearing held pursuant to subsection
(c) of this section. The court shall review the affordable
or workforce housing exaction or mitigation fee de novo
with the burden of proof on the land use permitting
authority to determine that the exaction or mitigation fee
is reasonably proportional, both in nature and extent, to
the costs of mitigating an identified impact from the
residential or commercial development.

Section 2. W.S. 15-1-103(a) by creating a new
paragraph (li) and 18-2-101(a) by creating a new paragraph
(ix) are amended to read:

15-1-103. General powers of governing bodies.

(a) The governing bodies of all cities and towns may:

(li) Impose exaction or mitigation fees on
residential or commercial development, including, subject
to W.S. 16-3-102, an exaction or mitigation fee for
affordable or workforce housing, if:
HB0197

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0664

(A) An essential nexus exists between a
legitimate governmental interest and each exaction or
mitigation fee; and

(B) Each exaction or mitigation fee is
reasonably proportional, both in nature and extent, to the
impact of the proposed development.

18-2-101. General powers.

(a) Each organized county in the state is a body
corporate and politic. The powers of the county shall be
exercised by a board of county commissioners which may:

(ix) Impose exaction or mitigation fees on
residential or commercial development, including, subject
to W.S. 16-3-102, an exaction or mitigation fee for
affordable or workforce housing, if:

(A) An essential nexus exists between a
legitimate governmental interest and each exaction or
mitigation fee; and
HB0197

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0664

(B) Each exaction or mitigation fee is
reasonably proportional, both in nature and extent, to the
impact of the proposed development.

Section 3. This act shall apply to all applications
for permits submitted for residential or commercial
development submitted on or after July 1, 2025.

Section 4. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0197